Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.066

Lost or destroyed warrants, instruments, or other evidence of indebtedness—Conditions on issuance.

Before a duplicate instrument is issued, the state treasurer or other issuing officer shall require the person making application for its issue to file in his or her office a written affidavit specifically alleging on oath that he or she is the proper owner, payee, or legal representative of such owner or payee of the original instrument, giving the date of issue, the number, amount, and for what services or claim or purpose the original instrument or series of instruments of which it is a part was issued, and that the same has been lost or destroyed, and has not been paid, or has not been received by him or her.

[ 2018 c 35 s 3; 2009 c 549 s 5037; 1979 ex.s. c 71 s 4; 1972 ex.s. c 74 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 54 s 1; 1965 ex.s. c 61 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.08.066. Prior: 1890 p 639 s 16; RRS s 11011; prior: 1888 p 236 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.09.120.]